Mississippi statutes. Title 21. Municipalities
Article 1. General Municipal Employees’ Retirement.
§ 21-29-45.
Death of member.

[For any municipality that has elected to authorize the continuation of or reinstatement of spouse retirement benefits under the provisions of Section 21-29-329, this section shall read as follows:]

Upon proper application to the general retirement board, the benefits to dependents of deceased members and retirants shall be paid as follows:

If any member dies for causes other than the performance of duty in the service of the municipality before completing five (5) years’ service, there shall be paid to his or her designated beneficiary or his or her legal representative, if no beneficiary has been designated, from the employees’ savings fund the sum equal to the amount accumulated in his or her individual account.

If any member dies who has not had less than five (5) and not more than twenty (20) years’ service with the municipality, there shall be paid to the spouse, from the retirement reserve fund, for each year’s active service, not to exceed a period of twenty (20) years, one-fortieth (1/40) of the average monthly salary or compensation received by the member in the four-year or two-year period, as the case may be, next preceding the death, for the use of the spouse and the child or children of the deceased member under the age of eighteen (18) years, so long as the spouse lives. If, after the death of the spouse, there remains a child or children of the deceased member under the age of eighteen (18) years, the payments shall continue to be made to a parent or lawful custodian of the child or children without the necessity of appointment as guardian for the benefit of the child or children, so long as the child or children are under the age of eighteen (18) years. After the death of the spouse, all payments to the spouse shall cease, and after the death or attainment of eighteen (18) years of any child or children of the deceased member, all payments to the child or children over eighteen (18) years of age shall cease. If the deceased member is not survived by a spouse, child or children under the age of eighteen (18) years, but is survived by a father or a mother dependent upon him or her, the payments shall continue to be made to the dependent father or mother, or both, so long as each lives. The word “dependent,” as used in this section, shall mean ‘wholly dependent,‘ as determined by the retirement board.

If any member dies after having completed twenty (20) years’ service as required by Section 21-29-31, or if any retirant dies, there shall be paid from the retirement reserve fund to the spouse or the dependents designated in paragraph (b) of this section, the amount of benefits or retirement pay equal to the sum being paid to the deceased member or retirant, or which would have been paid to the deceased member or retirant if he or she had applied for benefits under this section, on the date of his or her death.

If any member dies before becoming eligible to receive benefits under this article as a result of the performance of duty to the municipality, there shall be paid to the spouse or dependents designated in paragraph (b) of this section from the retirement reserve fund, an amount equal to fifty percent (50%) of the monthly salary of the deceased member on the date of his or her death. This amount shall be paid to the same beneficiaries and for the same period of time as those beneficiaries and periods of time set forth in paragraph (b) of this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3652.3-17; Laws, 1948, ch. 386, § 17; Laws, 1972, ch. 370, § 6; Laws, 1985, ch. 399, § 3; Laws, 2004, ch. 561, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§ 21-29-47.
Appeal.

Appeal may be taken from any decision of the board by any member of the system or other person entitled to the benefits under this article to the chancery court. However, no appeal may be taken from any finding or decision of the board after the expiration of one year from the date of the finding or decision.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3652.3-22; Laws, 1948, ch. 386, § 22.

§ 21-29-49.
Proration of payments.

Should the retirement reserve fund at any time be insufficient to make all payments properly payable therefrom, the amounts available in said fund shall be properly prorated until such time as amounts available therein may be sufficient to make all payments payable therefrom in full.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3652.3-23; Laws, 1948, ch. 386, § 23.

§ 21-29-51.
Rights to any benefit under this Article governed by Section 21-29-307.

The right of a person to an annuity, a retirement allowance or benefit, or to the return of contributions, or to any optional benefit or any other right accrued or accruing to any person under the provisions of this article, any retirement system and the moneys in any retirement system created by this article, shall be governed by the provisions of Section 21-29-307, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3652.3-21; Laws, 1948, ch. 386, § 21; Laws, 1989, ch. 503, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 21-29-53.
Other retirement laws not affected.

The General Municipal Employees’ Retirement Law and the provisions thereof shall in no way affect the provisions of Sections 21-29-101 through 21-29-151 of this chapter, establishing the firemen’s and policemen’s disability and relief fund, or the provisions of Article 5 of Chapter 11 of Title 25 of the Mississippi Code of 1972, concerning the retirement of school teachers.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3652.3-27; Laws, 1948, ch. 386, § 27.

§ 21-29-55.
Effect of change in form of government.

If, at any time, any municipality now covered by this article shall change its form of government, such change shall not affect the authorized retirement system, and this article shall be applicable to such municipality notwithstanding any future change in the form of government.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3652.3-29; Laws, 1948, ch. 386, § 29.

§ 21-29-57.
Vacation and sick leave; payment for unused time.

Nothing in this article shall limit or otherwise restrict the power of the governing body of any municipality that has a retirement system under this article to adopt such vacation and sick leave policies for its employees as it deems necessary. Any such municipality having a vacation and sick leave policy that provides for the payment of unused accumulated annual leave, personal leave or both to employees at the time of their retirement shall be authorized to make such payments to any employee who retires or has retired after September 30, 1991.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 394 § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 27, 1992).